Colorado, session 2026A, HB1377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26-1-143 as
follows:
26-1-143. Managed care entity payments - definition.
(1) IF A MANAGED CARE ENTITY RECEIVES FEDERAL FUNDS OR STATE
MONEY FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
AND PAYS THOSE FUNDS OR THAT MONEY TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT, THE
FUNDS OR MONEY RECEIVED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT IS NOT INCLUDED
IN THE CALCULATION OF STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "MANAGED CARE ENTITY" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS "MCE" IN
SECTION 25.5-5-402 (9)(b)(III)(B).
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1377